New York, session 2025-2026, A11049.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph d of subdivision 1 of section 11-a of the domes- 2 tic relations law, as amended by chapter 424 of the laws of 1990, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 d. In all cases in which the city clerk of such city or one of [his] 5 their deputies or the permanent members of [his] their staff so desig- 6 nated shall perform a marriage ceremony such official shall demand and 7 be entitled to collect therefor a fee to be fixed by the council of the 8 city of New York not exceeding [twenty-five] fifty-five dollars, which 9 sum shall be paid by the contracting parties before or immediately upon 10 the solemnization of the marriage; and all such fees so received shall 11 be paid over to the commissioner of finance of the city. 12 § 2. Subdivision 5 of section 15 of the domestic relations law, as 13 amended by chapter 35 of the laws of 2017, is amended to read as 14 follows: 15 5. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the city clerk 16 of the city of New York, before issuing any licenses herein provided 17 for, shall be entitled to a fee of [twenty-five] sixty dollars, which 18 sum shall be paid by the applicants before or at the time the license is 19 issued and all such fees so received shall be paid monthly into the city 20 treasury. 21 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15591-01-6